Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. Generally
§ 27-14-108.
Extrahazardous industries, employments, occupations; enumeration; definitions; optional coverage.

This act applies to the following, which shall be deemed extrahazardous employment:

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 30, § 2.

Regardless of individual occupation, all workers employed in the following sectors, subsectors, industry groups and industries, as each is defined in the most recent edition of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) manual:

Agriculture, sector 11:

Subsector 113, forestry and logging:

Industry group 1133, logging.

Industry group 4226, chemical and allied products, wholesale;

Industry group 4227, petroleum and petroleum products, wholesale;

Industry group 4228, beer, wine, and distilled alcoholic beverages, wholesale;

Industry group 4229, miscellaneous nondurable goods, wholesale.

Mining, sector 21;

Utilities, sector 22;

Construction, sector 23;

Manufacturing, sector 31-33;

Wholesale trade, sector 42:

Subsector 422, wholesale trade, nondurable goods:

(1)

Industry group 4225, farm product raw materials, wholesale;

Retail trade, sector 44-45:

Subsector 441, motor vehicle and parts dealer;

Subsector 444, building materials and garden equipment and supplies:

(1)

Industry group 4441, building materials and supplies dealers:

a.

NAICS industry 44419, other building materials.

Subsector 445, food and beverage stores:

(1)

Industry group 4452, specialty food stores:

a.

NAICS industry 44521, meat markets;

b.

NAICS industry 44522, fish and seafood markets;

c.

NAICS industry 44529, other specialty stores.

Subsector 447, gasoline stations;

Subsector 454, nonstore retailers:

(1)

Industry group 4543, direct selling establishments:

a.

NAICS industry 45431, fuel dealers.

Transportation and warehousing, sector 48-49:

Subsector 481, air transportation;

Subsector 484, truck transportation;

Subsector 485, urban transit systems;

Subsector 486, pipeline transportation;

Subsector 491, postal service;

Subsector 492, couriers and messengers;

Subsector 493, warehousing and storage.

Information, sector 51:

Subsector 511, publishing industries:

(1)

Industry group 5111, newspaper, periodical, book and database publishers.

Real estate and rental and leasing, sector 53:

Subsector 531, real estate:

(1)

Industry group 5311, lessors of real estate.

Subsector 532, rental and leasing services:

(1)

Industry group 5321, automotive equipment rental and leasing.

Administrative and support and waste management and remediation services, sector 56:

Subsector 561, administrative and support services:

(1)

Industry group 5616, investigation, guard and armored car services;

(2)

Industry group 5617, services to buildings and dwellings.

Subsector 562, waste management and remediation services.

Educational services, sector 61:

Subsector 611, educational services:

(1)

Industry group 6116, other schools and instruction:

a.

NAICS industry 61161, fine arts schools;

b.

NAICS industry 61162, sports and recreation instruction;

c.

NAICS industry 61169, all other schools and instruction:

i.

United States NAICS industry 611692, automobile driving schools.

Health care and social services, sector 62:

Subsector 621, ambulatory health care services;

Subsector 622, hospitals;

Subsector 623, nursing and residential care facilities;

Subsector 624, social assistance:

(1)

Industry group 6241, individual and family services;

(2)

Industry group 6242, community food and housing, and emergency and other relief services;

(3)

Industry group 6243, vocational rehabilitation services.

Except as provided under subsection (o) of this section, arts, entertainment and recreation, sector 71;

Accommodation and food services, sector 72;

Other services (except public administration), sector 81:

Subsector 811, repair and maintenance;

Subsector 812, personal and laundry services:

(1)

Industry group 8123, dry-cleaning and laundry services;

(2)

Industry group 8129, other personal services:

a.

NAICS industry 81291, pet care (except veterinary services).

Public administration, sector 92:

Subsector 922, justice, public order and safety activities:

(1)

Industry group 9221, justice, public order and safety activities:

a.

NAICS industry 92212, police protection;

b.

NAICS industry 92214, correctional institutions;

c.

NAICS industry 92215, fire protection, including firefighters while performing under the direction of a duly authorized officer in charge and engaged in competition at employer sanctioned training events, construction, maintenance or improvement of equipment or facilities utilized in fire protection activities, fundraising, civic affairs or other similar authorized activities.

Subsector 923, administration of human resource programs:

(1)

Industry group 9231, administration of human resource programs:

a.

NAICS industry 92312, administration of public health programs;

b.

NAICS industry 92313, administration of human resource programs (except education, public health and veterans’ affairs programs);

c.

NAICS industry 92314, administration of veterans’ affairs.

Subsector 924, administration of environmental quality programs.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 33, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 71, § 2; 1995, ch. 121, § 3.

This act applies to governmental entities engaged in an industrial classification listed under subsection (a) of this section and to employees of governmental entities engaged in or employed as the following:

Janitors, groundskeepers and maintenance workers;

Federal programs which require coverage for their participants;

State employees and effective until June 30, 2002, employees of the University of Wyoming while traveling in the performance of their duties;

and (v) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 132, § 2.

Casual employees engaged in fighting forest or grass fires when employed by a governmental entity;

Applicants or recipients of general welfare or relief who are employed by a governmental entity;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 132, § 2.

All adult and juvenile prisoners and probationers when performing work pursuant to law or court order;

Diagnostic and analytical laboratory employees;

Hazardous substance workers;

Power equipment operators;

Motor delivery drivers;

Workshop employees;

Persons performing community service pursuant to a criminal sentencing order or a diversion agreement entered into with a prosecuting authority, if the governing body of the jurisdiction for whom the service is performed has made a prior written election of coverage for the community service work;

Public school educational assistants who provide services to special education students while working directly with special education students and certified special education teachers and related services providers as defined by 34 C.F.R. 300.18 and 300.156 and W.S.

21-2-802

and

21-7-303

who provide services to eligible students while working directly with eligible students;

County coroners and deputy county coroners;

Fire protection, including firefighters while performing under the direction of a duly authorized officer in charge and engaged in competition at employer sanctioned training events, construction, maintenance or improvement of equipment or facilities utilized in the fire protection activities, fundraising, civic affairs or similar authorized activities;

[Effective January 2, 2023] A member of the legislature while engaged in an activity or traveling to or from an activity in the member’s official capacity as a member of the legislature.

Specifically enumerated volunteers to whom this act applies are:

Firefighters while:

Firefighting;

Performing rescue work;

Participating in a hazardous material response;

Responding to any other situation where the health or safety of the public is at risk;

Training for the activities enumerated in subparagraphs (A) through (D) and (F) of this paragraph, including while engaged in competition at employer sanctioned training events;

Constructing, maintaining or improving equipment or facilities utilized in the activities enumerated in subparagraphs (A) through (E) of this paragraph; or

Performing under the direction of a duly authorized officer in charge and engaged in fundraising, civic affairs or other similar authorized activities.

Search and rescue personnel;

Law enforcement personnel;

Search pilots;

Mine rescue workers;

Ambulance personnel;

Hazardous substance workers;

Emergency management agency personnel;

Elected county or local officials volunteering to perform governmental services on behalf of the jurisdiction to which they are elected, where the services are outside of the elected officials’ regular duties, if the governing body of the jurisdiction has made a prior written election of coverage for the volunteer work;

Volunteers working on projects approved by the Wyoming game and fish commission or the Wyoming department of state parks and cultural resources;

Law enforcement aides while:

Conducting patrols, reporting suspicious activities or controlling traffic and crowds on an authorized work schedule agreed to by and within the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency to which the volunteer service is provided;

Training under the auspices of a law enforcement agency.

As used in this section:

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 33, § 2.

“Diagnostic and analytical laboratory employees” means all laboratory personnel handling or analyzing or otherwise exposed to infections, chemical or biological hazardous materials or employed in a laboratory in which infections, chemical or biological hazardous materials are handled or stored;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 46, § 2.

“Workshop” means any location where power driven machinery is used and manual labor is exercised by way of trade or gain or otherwise incidental to the process of making, altering, repairing, printing or ornamenting, finishing or adapting for sale or otherwise any article or part of article, over which location the employer of the person working at the location has the right of access or control. Workshop includes any location where power machinery is being used and manual labor is exercised for recycling, crushing, incinerating, disposal or otherwise altering any article including but not limited to, paper products, metal, glass, rubber and plastic, over which location the employer of the person working at the location has the right of access or control. A workshop does not include any location on which only office fans, typewriters, adding machines, calculators, computers, dictaphones or other similar equipment driven by electric motors are operated which are sufficiently protected not to constitute a hazard to employees;

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 33, § 2.

“Power equipment operator” means any worker who operates power machinery;

“Mine rescue team” means mine rescue workers and the employers of the workers performing actual rescue operations or training rescue operations at any underground mine pursuant to the consent of the owner of the mine and the employers of the members of the team. Mine rescue team members while engaged in mine rescue operations and training, shall be considered employees of the employer at whose mine they engage in mine rescue work;

“Hazardous substance” means those substances designated or enumerated within the notification of hazardous waste activity publication of the federal environmental protection agency;

“Hazardous substance worker” means a trained employee or volunteer involved with performing emergency response and post emergency response operations for the release or substantial threat of release of hazardous substances;

“Eligible student” means a student with behavioral, emotional, cognitive, learning, physical or health disabilities who requires educational services to be provided outside of the regular classroom because the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily in the regular classroom.

This act does not apply to the following:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 121, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 2, § 2.

through (ix) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 121, § 3.

Those individuals excluded as an employee under W.S. 27-14-102(a)(vii)(A) through (O).

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 30, § 2.

Any employee not enumerated under subsections (a) through (g) of this section or not employed in an extrahazardous employment enumerated under this section may be covered and subject to the provisions of this act and his employment shall be treated as if extrahazardous for purposes of this act, if his employer elects to obtain coverage under this act and makes payments as required by this act. An employer electing coverage pursuant to this subsection may only elect to cover all his employees. An employer may withdraw coverage elected under this subsection at any time if the elected coverage has been in effect for at least two (2) years and the employer is current on all contributions and payments required under this act.

Any corporation, limited liability company, partnership or sole proprietorship may elect to obtain coverage under this act for any or all of its corporate officers, limited liability company members, partners in a partnership or sole proprietor by notifying the division in writing of its election upon initial registration with the division, or thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of a calendar quarter. Any employer electing coverage pursuant to this subsection shall, if it has other employees, simultaneously elect coverage for its employees, as provided in subsection (j) of this section, if those employees are not already covered under this act. Notwithstanding subsection (j) of this section, an employer shall not withdraw coverage at any time during the subsequent eight (8) calendar quarters. Application for termination of coverage under this subsection shall be filed in writing with the division. Termination of coverage shall be effective the first day of the month following the division’s receipt of the notice of termination which shall specify whether the termination is for the officers, members and partners or for the officers, members, partners and all electively covered employees.

Any employer may elect to obtain coverage under this act for school-to-work participants engaging in program activities at his place of business in accordance with rules and regulations of the division.

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 10, § 2.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (a)(ii)(P) of this section and upon request of an employer, the department may exclude employment from coverage under this act if it determines the primary source of revenue of the employer’s business is derived from operations classified under subparagraph (a)(ii)(P) of this section and any of the following industries:

Agriculture, forestry, fishing and hunting, sector 11:

Subsector 111, crop production;

Subsector 112, animal production;

Subsector 113, forestry and logging:

Industry group 1131, timber tract operations;

Industry group 1132, forest nurseries and gathering of forest products.

Subsector 115, support activities for agriculture and forestry.

Any university of the state of Wyoming or any community college, school district or private or parochial school or college may elect to obtain coverage under this act for any person who may at any time be receiving training under any work or job training program for the purpose of training or learning trades or occupations. The bona fide student so placed shall be deemed an employee of the respective university, community college, school district or private or parochial school or college sponsoring the training or rehabilitation program.

A team owner shall obtain coverage under this act for professional athletes as defined in W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xxix). For the purpose of determining employer contributions under this act, all professional athletes for whom coverage is obtained are deemed to be paid, for each month during which competition or team practice is held, the average monthly wage most recently computed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-802(b). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the division shall classify professional athletes covered under this subsection under NAICS industry code number 711211, sports teams and clubs, and shall keep that classification separate for rate making purposes.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 190, § 1; 1992, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 122, § 1; ch. 216, § 1; 1995, ch. 121, §§ 2, 3; ch. 197, § 1; 1996, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; ch. 74, § 2; ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 67, § 1; ch. 93, § 1; ch. 137, § 1; ch. 193, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 1998, ch. 54, § 1; 1999, ch. 32, § 1; ch. 46, § 2; ch. 97, § 1; 2000, ch. 32, § 1; 2001, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; ch. 30, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 97, § 1; 2006, ch. 2, § 2; 2009, ch. 156, § 1; 2010, ch. 112, § 1; 2011, ch. 7, § 1; 2014 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 156, § 1, effective January 2, 2023; 2020 ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, repealed (g)(iv), pertaining to employers with itinerant business operations without fixed base of operations in Wyoming.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (k), in the first sentence, substituted “partnership or sole proprietorship” for “employing individuals covered pursuant to subsections (a) or (j) of this section”, inserted “any or all of” preceding “its corporate officers”, inserted “partners in a partnership or sole proprietor” following “limited liability company members”, deleted “electing to cover any or all of its officers or members and” preceding “notifying the division”, added the second sentence, deleted “not less than thirty (30) days before any calendar quarter following the initial eight (8) calendar quarters of coverage” from the end of the third sentence, and added the fourth sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (a)(ii)(S)(I)(1)c, which formerly read: “NAICS industry 92215, fire protection”; added (d)(xviii); in (e), added “including while engaged in competition at employer sanctioned training events” in (e)(i)(E), added (e)(i)(G), and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (e)(x), inserted “or the Wyoming department of state parks and cultural resources.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (k),
inserted “if it has other employees” following “subsection shall” in the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (d)(xvi), added the language following “services to special education students.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (d)(xvi), inserted “while working directly with special education students” following “special education students” and substituted “students while working directly with eligible students” for “students with behavioral, emotional, cognitive, learning, physical or health disabilities that require educational services to be provided outside of the regular classroom because the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily in the regular classroom”; and added (f)(x).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 2, 2023, added (d)(xix).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 1992, ch. 33, § 1, purportedly also amended subsection (f)(v). This amendment was not given effect due to the repeal of this subsection by Laws 1992, ch. 33, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Constitutionality. —

The state had a legitimate interest in and rational basis for creating the statutory classification that exempts mobile home parks from mandatory workers' compensation coverage. Gonzales v. Grass Valley Mobile Home Park, 933 P.2d 484,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Applicability. —

As a general rule, if the employer does not engage in extrahazardous activities, then whether an individual employee's activities are hazardous in nature is not material. Gonzales v. Grass Valley Mobile Home Park, 933 P.2d 484,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-108

and Wyo. Const. art. 10, § 4, the employer's Wyoming operations were properly assigned a code based on its primary business, and the distribution center was not entitled to its own classification separate from the employer's retail stores; this coding was not extrahazardous and the workers were not entitled to benefits because the employer was not engaged in extrahazardous business activities and did not elect to contribute to the state workers'
compensation fund.
Araguz v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 148, 262 P.3d 1263,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Oct. 28, 2011).

Coverage of state employees. —

Appointed member of state livestock board was a state employee within meaning of Workers' Compensation Act, and he was injured while traveling in the performance of his duties where he was involved in an automobile accident while traveling to attend a regularly scheduled board meeting. Sell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Sell), 7 P.3d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2000).

Because workers' compensation statute did not define “state employee,” court elected to use ordinary and obvious definition of “public employee” found in Wyoming Governmental Claims Act for purposes of the applicability of this section. Sell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Sell), 7 P.3d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2000).

Coverage of corporate officers. —

A claimant's corporate officer coverage was not withdrawn by his employer's failure to return to the worker's compensation division an affidavit affirming the claimant's exposure to hazards; however, the corporation did withdraw officer coverage when it stopped listing the claimant as a corporate officer on its monthly reports filed pursuant to § 27-14-202(a), and when it stopped submitting a premium for his coverage at the same time. Newton v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 922 P.2d 863,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Kunkle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 49, 109 P.3d 887,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(2005).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workmen's compensation: injury while crossing or walking along railroad or street railway tracks, going to or from work, as arising out of and in the course of employment, 50 ALR2d 363.

Suicide as compensable under workmen's compensation act, 15 ALR3d 616.

Workmen's compensation: injury or death due to storms, 42 ALR3d 385.

Workmen's compensation: injury sustained while attending employer-sponsored social affair as arising out of and in the course of employment, 47 ALR3d 566.

Compensation for injury by firearms at rifle range, shooting gallery, military exercise, etc., 49 ALR3d 762.

Master and servant: employer's liability for injury caused by food or drink purchased by employee in plant facilities, 50 ALR3d 505.

Industrial accidents involving conveyor belts or systems, 2 ALR4th 262.

Eligibility for workers' compensation as affected by claimant's misrepresentation of health or physical condition at time of hiring, 12 ALR5th 658.

Workers' compensation: coverage of employee's injury or death from exposure to the elements—Modern cases, 20 ALR5th 346.

Workers' compensation: law enforcement officer's recovery for injury sustained during exercise or physical recreation activities, 44 ALR5th 569.

Presumption or inference that accidental death of employee engaged in occupation of manufacturing or processing arose out of and in course of employment, 47 ALR5th 801.

§ 27-14-109.
Collective system for county governments or county governmental entities.

The division, upon application, may allow county governments or county governmental entities to establish a collective system to report payroll, pay premiums, process injury reports, manage claims and provide other services required under this chapter for the employees of the county governments or county governmental entities. The division shall adopt rules and regulations to implement this section.

History.

2017 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 89, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 27-14-110.
Student learner agreements.

A Wyoming school district, community college or technical school and an employer may enter into a student learner agreement for the purposes of providing student learners vocational work and training opportunities and for student learners to earn course credit from the school district, community college or technical school, compensation from the employer, or both. A copy of any student learner agreement entered into under this section shall be submitted by the employer to the division.

A student learner may enter into a student training agreement with an employer to complete work or vocational training at the employer’s business for course credit from the school district, community college or technical school, compensation from the employer, or both. A copy of any student training agreement entered into under this section shall be submitted by the employer to the division.

The employer shall notify the division if:

A student learner agreement is terminated or extended with a school district, community college or technical school, and if terminated, the date of termination;

A student training agreement is extended or terminated, and if terminated, the date of termination.

An employer may enter into student learner agreements with more than one (1) Wyoming school district, community college or technical school, provided that the employer shall enter into separate student learner agreements with each school district, community college or technical school.

The division shall create and maintain standard student learner agreements and student training agreements for use by employers, student learners, school districts, community colleges and technical schools. The standard agreements shall be maintained on the department’s website and provided to employers, students, school districts, community colleges and technical schools.

A student learner who enters into a student training agreement with an employer who has a valid and current student learner agreement with the student learner’s school district, community college or technical school shall be covered under the worker’s compensation program established in this act. Each employer shall pay the premiums charged for each student learner as required under this act. The division shall account for student learners in calculating benefits charged to an employer’s experience rating account under this act.

The division shall establish rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.

History.

2021 ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 160, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.